dictionary/Japanese/edict-v5.aff
SET UTF-8

SFX Aa Y 1
SFX Aa い くありませんでした .

SFX Ab Y 9
SFX Ab う いませんでした .
SFX Ab く きませんでした .
SFX Ab ぐ ぎませんでした .
SFX Ab す しませんでした .
SFX Ab つ ちませんでした .
SFX Ab ぬ にませんでした .
SFX Ab ぶ びませんでした .
SFX Ab む みませんでした .
SFX Ab る りませんでした .

SFX Ac Y 2
SFX Ac くる きませんでした .
SFX Ac る ませんでした .

SFX Ad Y 1
SFX Ad する しませんでした .

SFX Ae Y 1
SFX Ae い くありません .

SFX Af Y 1
SFX Af る ませんでした .

SFX Ag Y 9
SFX Ag う いましょう .
SFX Ag く きましょう .
SFX Ag ぐ ぎましょう .
SFX Ag す しましょう .
SFX Ag つ ちましょう .
SFX Ag ぬ にましょう .
SFX Ag ぶ びましょう .
SFX Ag む みましょう .
SFX Ag る りましょう .

SFX Ah Y 2
SFX Ah くる きましょう .
SFX Ah る ましょう .

SFX Ai Y 1
SFX Ai する しましょう .

SFX Aj Y 10
SFX Aj ぐ いじゃう .
SFX Aj く いちゃう .
SFX Aj す しちゃう .
SFX Aj う っちゃう .
SFX Aj く っちゃう .
SFX Aj つ っちゃう .
SFX Aj る っちゃう .
SFX Aj ぬ んじゃう .
SFX Aj ぶ んじゃう .
SFX Aj む んじゃう .

SFX Ak Y 9
SFX Ak う いすぎる .
SFX Ak く きすぎる .
SFX Ak ぐ ぎすぎる .
SFX Ak す しすぎる .
SFX Ak つ ちすぎる .
SFX Ak ぬ にすぎる .
SFX Ak ぶ びすぎる .
SFX Ak む みすぎる .
SFX Ak る りすぎる .

SFX Al Y 9
SFX Al う いなさい .
SFX Al く きなさい .
SFX Al ぐ ぎなさい .
SFX Al す しなさい .
SFX Al つ ちなさい .
SFX Al ぬ になさい .
SFX Al ぶ びなさい .
SFX Al む みなさい .
SFX Al る りなさい .

SFX Am Y 9
SFX Am う いました .
SFX Am く きました .
SFX Am ぐ ぎました .
SFX Am す しました .
SFX Am つ ちました .
SFX Am ぬ にました .
SFX Am ぶ びました .
SFX Am む みました .
SFX Am る りました .

SFX An Y 9
SFX An う いません .
SFX An く きません .
SFX An ぐ ぎません .
SFX An す しません .
SFX An つ ちません .
SFX An ぬ にません .
SFX An ぶ びません .
SFX An む みません .
SFX An る りません .

SFX Ao Y 1
SFX Ao い かったら .

SFX Ap Y 1
SFX Ap い かったり .

SFX Aq Y 2
SFX Aq くる きすぎる .
SFX Aq る すぎる .

SFX Ar Y 2
SFX Ar くる きちゃう .
SFX Ar る ちゃう .

SFX As Y 2
SFX As くる きなさい .
SFX As る なさい .

SFX At Y 2
SFX At くる きました .
SFX At る ました .

SFX Au Y 2
SFX Au くる きません .
SFX Au る ません .

SFX Av Y 2
SFX Av くる こさせる .
SFX Av る させる .

SFX Aw Y 2
SFX Aw くる こられる .
SFX Aw る られる .

SFX Ax Y 1
SFX Ax する しすぎる .

SFX Ay Y 1
SFX Ay する しちゃう .

SFX Az Y 1
SFX Az する しなさい .

SFX Ba Y 1
SFX Ba する しました .

SFX Bb Y 1
SFX Bb する しません .

SFX Bc Y 1
SFX Bc る ましょう .

SFX Bd Y 9
SFX Bd う いそう .
SFX Bd く きそう .
SFX Bd ぐ ぎそう .
SFX Bd す しそう .
SFX Bd つ ちそう .
SFX Bd ぬ にそう .
SFX Bd ぶ びそう .
SFX Bd む みそう .
SFX Bd る りそう .

SFX Be Y 9
SFX Be う いたい .
SFX Be く きたい .
SFX Be ぐ ぎたい .
SFX Be す したい .
SFX Be つ ちたい .
SFX Be ぬ にたい .
SFX Be ぶ びたい .
SFX Be む みたい .
SFX Be る りたい .

SFX Bf Y 9
SFX Bf く いたら .
SFX Bf ぐ いだら .
SFX Bf す したら .
SFX Bf う ったら .
SFX Bf つ ったら .
SFX Bf る ったら .
SFX Bf ぬ んだら .
SFX Bf ぶ んだら .
SFX Bf む んだら .

SFX Bg Y 9
SFX Bg く いたり .
SFX Bg ぐ いだり .
SFX Bg す したり .
SFX Bg う ったり .
SFX Bg つ ったり .
SFX Bg る ったり .
SFX Bg ぬ んだり .
SFX Bg ぶ んだり .
SFX Bg む んだり .

SFX Bh Y 9
SFX Bh う います .
SFX Bh く きます .
SFX Bh ぐ ぎます .
SFX Bh す します .
SFX Bh つ ちます .
SFX Bh ぬ にます .
SFX Bh ぶ びます .
SFX Bh む みます .
SFX Bh る ります .

SFX Bi Y 8
SFX Bi く かせる .
SFX Bi ぐ がせる .
SFX Bi つ たせる .
SFX Bi ぬ なせる .
SFX Bi ぶ ばせる .
SFX Bi む ませる .
SFX Bi る らせる .
SFX Bi う わせる .

SFX Bj Y 1
SFX Bj い かった .

SFX Bk Y 9
SFX Bk く かない .
SFX Bk ぐ がない .
SFX Bk す さない .
SFX Bk つ たない .
SFX Bk ぬ なない .
SFX Bk ぶ ばない .
SFX Bk む まない .
SFX Bk る らない .
SFX Bk う わない .

SFX Bl Y 7
SFX Bl く かれる .
SFX Bl ぐ がれる .
SFX Bl つ たれる .
SFX Bl ぬ なれる .
SFX Bl ぶ ばれる .
SFX Bl む まれる .
SFX Bl う われる .

SFX Bm Y 2
SFX Bm くる きそう .
SFX Bm る そう .

SFX Bn Y 2
SFX Bn くる きたい .
SFX Bn る たい .

SFX Bo Y 2
SFX Bo くる きたら .
SFX Bo る たら .

SFX Bp Y 2
SFX Bp くる きたり .
SFX Bp る たり .

SFX Bq Y 2
SFX Bq くる きます .
SFX Bq る ます .

SFX Br Y 1
SFX Br い くない .

SFX Bs Y 1
SFX Bs い ければ .

SFX Bt Y 2
SFX Bt くる こない .
SFX Bt る ない .

SFX Bu Y 2
SFX Bu くる こよう .
SFX Bu る よう .

SFX Bv Y 2
SFX Bv くる これる .
SFX Bv る れる .

SFX Bw Y 1
SFX Bw する させる .

SFX Bx Y 1
SFX Bx る させる .

SFX By Y 1
SFX By す される .

SFX Bz Y 1
SFX Bz する される .

SFX Ca Y 1
SFX Ca する しそう .

SFX Cb Y 1
SFX Cb する したい .

SFX Cc Y 1
SFX Cc する したら .

SFX Cd Y 1
SFX Cd する したり .

SFX Ce Y 1
SFX Ce する しない .

SFX Cf Y 1
SFX Cf する します .

SFX Cg Y 1
SFX Cg する しよう .

SFX Ch Y 1
SFX Ch い すぎる .

SFX Ci Y 1
SFX Ci る すぎる .

SFX Cj Y 1
SFX Cj る ちゃう .

SFX Ck Y 1
SFX Ck る なさい .

SFX Cl Y 1
SFX Cl る ました .

SFX Cm Y 1
SFX Cm る ません .

SFX Cn Y 1
SFX Cn る られる .

SFX Co Y 1
SFX Co る られる .

SFX Cp Y 10
SFX Cp く いた .
SFX Cp ぐ いだ .
SFX Cp す した .
SFX Cp う った .
SFX Cp く った .
SFX Cp つ った .
SFX Cp る った .
SFX Cp ぬ んだ .
SFX Cp ぶ んだ .
SFX Cp む んだ .

SFX Cq Y 10
SFX Cq く いて .
SFX Cq ぐ いで .
SFX Cq す して .
SFX Cq う って .
SFX Cq く って .
SFX Cq つ って .
SFX Cq る って .
SFX Cq ぬ んで .
SFX Cq ぶ んで .
SFX Cq む んで .

SFX Cr Y 9
SFX Cr う えば .
SFX Cr く けば .
SFX Cr ぐ げば .
SFX Cr す せば .
SFX Cr つ てば .
SFX Cr ぬ ねば .
SFX Cr ぶ べば .
SFX Cr む めば .
SFX Cr る れば .

SFX Cs Y 9
SFX Cs う える .
SFX Cs く ける .
SFX Cs ぐ げる .
SFX Cs す せる .
SFX Cs つ てる .
SFX Cs ぬ ねる .
SFX Cs ぶ べる .
SFX Cs む める .
SFX Cs る れる .

SFX Ct Y 9
SFX Ct う おう .
SFX Ct く こう .
SFX Ct ぐ ごう .
SFX Ct す そう .
SFX Ct つ とう .
SFX Ct ぬ のう .
SFX Ct ぶ ぼう .
SFX Ct む もう .
SFX Ct る ろう .

SFX Cu Y 9
SFX Cu く かず .
SFX Cu ぐ がず .
SFX Cu す さず .
SFX Cu つ たず .
SFX Cu ぬ なず .
SFX Cu ぶ ばず .
SFX Cu む まず .
SFX Cu る らず .
SFX Cu う わず .

SFX Cv Y 2
SFX Cv くる きた .
SFX Cv る た .

SFX Cw Y 2
SFX Cw くる きて .
SFX Cw る て .

SFX Cx Y 1
SFX Cx い くて .

SFX Cy Y 2
SFX Cy くる こい .
SFX Cy る い .

SFX Cz Y 2
SFX Cz くる こず .
SFX Cz る ず .

SFX Da Y 1
SFX Da する した .

SFX Db Y 1
SFX Db する して .

SFX Dc Y 2
SFX Dc する しろ .
SFX Dc する せよ .

SFX Dd Y 1
SFX Dd する せず .

SFX De Y 1
SFX De い そう .

SFX Df Y 1
SFX Df る そう .

SFX Dg Y 1
SFX Dg る たい .

SFX Dh Y 1
SFX Dh る たら .

SFX Di Y 1
SFX Di る たり .

SFX Dj Y 1
SFX Dj る ない .

SFX Dk Y 1
SFX Dk る ます .

SFX Dl Y 1
SFX Dl る よう .

SFX Dm Y 1
SFX Dm る れば .

SFX Dn Y 1
SFX Dn る れば .

SFX Do Y 1
SFX Do る れば .

SFX Dp Y 1
SFX Dp る れる .

SFX Dq Y 22
SFX Dq いる い .
SFX Dq える え .
SFX Dq きる き .
SFX Dq ぎる ぎ .
SFX Dq ける け .
SFX Dq げる げ .
SFX Dq じる じ .
SFX Dq せる せ .
SFX Dq ぜる ぜ .
SFX Dq ちる ち .
SFX Dq てる て .
SFX Dq でる で .
SFX Dq にる に .
SFX Dq ねる ね .
SFX Dq ひる ひ .
SFX Dq びる び .
SFX Dq へる へ .
SFX Dq べる べ .
SFX Dq みる み .
SFX Dq める め .
SFX Dq りる り .
SFX Dq れる れ .

SFX Dr Y 9
SFX Dr う い .
SFX Dr く き .
SFX Dr ぐ ぎ .
SFX Dr す し .
SFX Dr つ ち .
SFX Dr ぬ に .
SFX Dr ぶ び .
SFX Dr む み .
SFX Dr る り .

SFX Ds Y 9
SFX Ds う え .
SFX Ds く け .
SFX Ds ぐ げ .
SFX Ds す せ .
SFX Ds つ て .
SFX Ds ぬ ね .
SFX Ds ぶ べ .
SFX Ds む め .
SFX Ds る れ .

SFX Dt Y 1
SFX Dt い く .

SFX Du Y 1
SFX Du い さ .

SFX Dv Y 1
SFX Dv る ず .

SFX Dw Y 1
SFX Dw る た .

SFX Dx Y 1
SFX Dx る て .

SFX Dy Y 1
SFX Dy 0 な .

SFX Dz Y 1
SFX Dz 0 な .

SFX Ea Y 1
SFX Ea 0 な .

SFX Eb Y 1
SFX Eb 0 な .

SFX Ec Y 2
SFX Ec る よ .
SFX Ec る ろ .
